Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.42.050

Public officers and employees—Conduct.

In addition to provisions of general law relating to public officials and others in public administration, employment or public works, the duties and conduct of such officers and other persons shall be governed by: (1) Chapter 9A.68 RCW relating to bribery of a public officer; (2) Article II, section 30 of the Constitution of the state of Washington relating to bribery or corrupt solicitation; (3) RCW 35.17.150 relating to misconduct in code cities having a commission form of government; (4) chapter 42.23 RCW in regard to interest in contracts; (5) chapter 29A.84 RCW relating to misconduct in connection with elections; (6) RCW 49.44.060 relating to grafting by employees; (7) RCW 49.44.020 and 49.44.030 relating to the giving or solicitation of a bribe to a labor representative; (8) chapter 42.20 RCW relating to misconduct of a public officer; (9) RCW 49.52.050 and 49.52.090 relating to rebating by employees; and (10) chapter 9.18 RCW relating to bribery and grafting.

[ 2015 c 53 s 58; 1983 c 3 s 67; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.050.]

NOTES: